New Mexico, session 2026, SB186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Public Assistance Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE--PROHIBITED USES.-- A. A person who receives benefits from the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program shall not use those benefits to purchase a sweetened drink or candy. B. As used in this section: (1) "candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey or other natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops or pieces; and (2) "sweetened drink" means a nonalcoholic beverage made with water that contains five grams or more of added sugar or any amount of artificial sweeteners. "Sweetened drink" does not include a beverage that contains: (a) milk or milk products; (b) soymilk, rice milk or similar milk substitutes; or (c) at least fifty percent vegetable or fruit juice by volume." - 2 -